Utah statutes.
4-39-206.   Records to be maintained.

(1)  The following records and information shall be maintained by a domesticated elk facility for a period of five years:

(a)  records of purchase, acquisition, distribution, and production histories of domesticated elk;

(b)  records documenting antler harvesting, production, and distribution; and

(c)  health certificates and genetic purity records.

(2)  For purposes of carrying out the provisions of this chapter and rules promulgated under this chapter and, at any reasonable time during regular business hours, the department shall have free and unimpeded access to inspect all records required to be kept.

(3)  The department may make copies of the records referred to in this section.



Amended by Chapter 378, 2010 General Session

